California statutes. Public Resources Code
Funds granted pursuant to Section 5907 may be expended for development, rehabilitation, or restoration only on lands owned by, or subject to a lease or other interest, held by the applicant city, county, city and county, district, or nonprofit organization. If those lands are not owned by the applicant, the applicant shall first demonstrate to the satisfaction of the administering agency that the project will provide public benefits commensurate with the type and duration of interest in
 land held by the applicant.

(History: Added June 7, 1988, by initiative Proposition 70.)
-------------------------------------------

5918.

Every expenditure pursuant to this division shall comply with the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000)).

(History: Added June 7, 1988, by initiative Proposition 70.)
-------------------------------------------

5919.

(a) No state funds authorized under Section 5907 may be disbursed unless the applicant agrees:

(1) To maintain and operate the property acquired, developed, rehabilitated, or restored with the funds in perpetuity. With the approval of the granting agency, the applicant or its successors in interest in the property may transfer the responsibility to maintain and operate the property in
 accordance with this section.

(2) To use the property only for the purposes of this division and to make no other use, sale, or other disposition of the property except as authorized by specific act of the Legislature.

All applicants for a grant pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) and pursuant to subdivisions (c), (d), and (e) of Section 5907 shall submit an application to the administering agency for grant approval. Each application shall include in writing the agreements specified in paragraphs (1) and (2) of this subdivision.

The agreements specified in paragraphs (1) and (2) of this subdivision shall not prevent the transfer of property acquired, developed, rehabilitated, or restored with funds authorized pursuant to Section 5907 from the applicant to a public agency, provided the successor public agency assumes the obligations imposed by those
 agreements.

(b) If the use of the property acquired through grants pursuant to this division is changed to one other than permitted under the category from which the funds were appropriated, or the property is sold or otherwise disposed of, an amount equal to the (1) amount of the grant, (2) the fair market value of the real property, or (3) the proceeds from the portion thereof, acquired, developed, rehabilitated, or restored with the grant shall be used by the grantee, subject to subdivision (a), for a purpose authorized in that category or shall be reimbursed to the fund and be available for appropriation only for a use authorized in that category.

If the property sold or otherwise disposed of is less than the entire interest in the property originally acquired, developed, rehabilitated, or restored with the grant, an amount equal to the proceeds or the fair market value of the property interest
 sold or otherwise disposed of, whichever is greater, shall be used by the grantee, subject to subdivision (a) of this section, for a purpose authorized in that category or shall be reimbursed to the fund and be available for appropriation only for a use authorized in that category.

(History: Added June 7, 1988, by initiative Proposition 70.)
-------------------------------------------

5920.

(a) All real property acquired pursuant to this division shall be acquired in compliance with Chapter 16 (commencing with Section 7260) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code. The administering agency shall prescribe procedures sufficient to assure compliance by local public agencies and nonprofit organizations which receive funds under Section 5907.

(b) For the purposes of this division,
 acquisition may include gifts, purchases, leases, easements, the exercise of eminent domain if expressly authorized, the transfer or exchange of property for other property of like value, transfers of development rights or credits, and purchases of development rights and other interests.

(c) All grants, gifts, devises, or bequests to the state, conditional or unconditional, for park, conservation, recreational, agricultural, or other purposes for which real property may be acquired or developed pursuant to this division, may be accepted and received on behalf of the state by the appropriate departmental director with the approval of the Director of Finance. The grants, gifts, devises, or bequests are available, when appropriated by the Legislature, for expenditure for the purposes specified in Section 5907.

(History: Added June 7, 1988, by initiative Proposition 70.)
-------------------------------------------

5921.

(a) With respect to Section 5907, all appropriations for the purposes of subdivision (a), paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), paragraph (1) of subdivision (d), and paragraphs (1), (2), (3), and (4) of subdivision (e) for the program shall be included in a section of the Budget Bill for the 1989–90 fiscal year and each succeeding fiscal year for consideration by the Legislature and shall bear the caption “California Wildlife, Coastal, and Park Land
 Conservation Program.” The section shall contain separate items for each project, each class of project, or each element of the program for which an appropriation is made.

(b) All appropriations specified in subdivision (a) are subject to all limitations enacted in the Budget Act and to all fiscal procedures prescribed by law with respect to the expenditure of state funds unless expressly exempted from those laws by a statute enacted by the Legislature. The Budget Act shall contain proposed appropriations only for the program elements and classes of projects contemplated by this division, and no funds derived from the bonds authorized by law for the purposes of this division may be expended pursuant to an appropriation not contained in those sections of the Budget Act.

(c) All funds not described in subdivision (a) are appropriated directly to the state or local agency which is to
 administer them. These funds are not subject to appropriation by the Legislature except as provided in Section 5922.

(History: Added June 7, 1988, by initiative Proposition 70.)
-------------------------------------------

5922.

With respect to Section 5907, if money allocated pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (3) of subdivision (b) [except for subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b)]; subdivision (c) [except for paragraph (1)]; paragraphs (2), (3), (4), (5), and (6) of subdivision (d), and paragraphs (1) and (5) of subdivision (e), is not expended prior to July 1, 1998, the agency to which the funds are originally allocated shall submit to the Legislature a plan for expenditure of the
 funds in accordance with the purposes of this division within a county in which the funds were originally authorized to be expended, and the Legislature may approve the plan by statute, passed in each house by a two-thirds vote. If the reallocated funds are not expended within 10 years after the effective date of that statute, the Legislature may, by statute, passed in each house by a two-thirds vote, reallocate the funds to the Department of Parks and Recreation for expenditure in the area of the state with the greatest need consistent with the purposes of this division.

(History: Added June 7, 1988, by initiative Proposition 70.)
-------------------------------------------

5923.

If some or all of the funds allocated pursuant to subparagraph (E) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 5907 are not expended by the Department of Parks and Recreation by July 1, 1993, the remaining funds shall be allocated to the Santa Monica Mountains Conservancy for the purposes of that subparagraph. The Legislature may at any time allocate all or a portion of these funds to the Santa Monica Mountains Conservancy for the purposes for which the funds were originally
 allocated.

(History: Added June 7, 1988, by initiative Proposition 70.)
-------------------------------------------

5924.

(a) Any lands acquired pursuant to subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 5907 or pursuant to other sections of this act for acquisition of other lands of the Agua Caliente Indian Reservation shall be subject to this section. After that acquisition, the state shall convey title to all those lands to the United States in trust for the Agua Caliente Band of Cahuilla Indians as part of the Agua Caliente Indian Reservation on the conditions that
 (1) the lands be administered by the Agua Caliente Band of Cahuilla Indians as additions to the existing tribal reserves established by Section 3(c) of the act of September 21, 1959 (73 Stat. 603, P.L. 86-339), (2) the lands be open to the public, subject to reasonable restrictions such as those presently in effect for the above existing tribal reserves, and (3) the lands be used for protection of wildlife habitat and other resources, preservation of open space, recreation, preservation of the native palms and other plants and animals native to the area, and the preservation in place or respectful public display, at the option of the Agua Caliente Band of Cahuilla Indians, of the archeological and cultural resources of the lands.

Existing tribal reserve lands shall not be acquired, and acquisition within the reservation shall be limited to the southerly three-fourths of Section 2 and Sections 3, 11, 12, 14, 16, 22, 26, 29, 34, and 36 of Township 5 south; range 4
 east, San Bernardino base and meridian, unless otherwise approved by the Agua Caliente Indian Reservation Tribal Council. No acquisition within the boundaries of the Aqua Caliente Indian Reservation shall be made without the approval of the Aqua Caliente Band of Cahuilla Indians Tribal Council.

(b) Lands acquired pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 5907 shall not be acquired through the use of eminent domain.

(c) Reasonable public access to lands acquired in fee with funds made available pursuant to this division shall be provided except where that access may interfere with habitat protection.

(History: Added June 7, 1988, by initiative Proposition 70.)
-------------------------------------------

5924.5.

In addition to the purposes specified in Section 5924, funds appropriated in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 5907 for Palm and Andreas Canyons may also be encumbered for interpretative facilities and minimal facilities necessary to facilitate public access if approved by the Tribal Council of the
 Agua Caliente Band of Cahuilla Indians.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1623, Sec. 1.   Effective September 30, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

5925.

With respect to funds allocated pursuant to subparagraph (L) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 5907, if it is not possible to acquire the entire Pogonip property, the funds shall be distributed to the entities listed in the priority established in subparagraph (L) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 5907 for the acquisition of portions of the Pogonip property and the balance, if any, for other greenbelt lands located in the City of Santa Cruz and the County of
 Santa Cruz as defined in the 1979 City of Santa Cruz Greenbelt Ordinance. If any of these entities fails to accomplish the acquisition of all or portions of the Pogonip property by January 1, 1991, the Department of Parks and Recreation shall acquire all or a portion of the Pogonip property as an addition to Henry Cowell Redwoods State Park. Acquisition shall be deemed to have occurred if a binding contract is entered into on or before January 1, 1991, notwithstanding the fact that a transfer of title shall occur subsequent to that date.

(History: Added June 7, 1988, by initiative Proposition 70.)
-------------------------------------------

5926.

None of the funds allocated pursuant to subparagraph (G) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 5907 for acquisition of land for the Baldwin Hills State Recreation Area or paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 5907 for expansion of Bolsa Chica Linear Park shall be used to acquire lands from which oil or gas is presently being extracted or from which oil or gas is capable of being extracted.

(History: Added June 7, 1988, by initiative Proposition 70.)
-------------------------------------------

5927.

The qualification for or allocation of a grant or grants to a local agency under one subdivision, paragraph, or subparagraph of Section 5907 shall not preclude eligibility for an additional allocation of grant funds to the same local agency pursuant to another subdivision, paragraph, or subparagraph of Section 5907 or pursuant to Section 2720 of the Fish and Game Code.

(History: Added June 7, 1988, by initiative Proposition 70.)
-------------------------------------------

5928.

(a) Funds available pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (e) of Section 5907 shall be used solely for Monterey County’s acquisition, as specified in subdivision (b) of Section 5920, of critical viewshed properties along the Big Sur Coast, and shall be expended in strict compliance with the policies of the 1988 Bond Act Account, which was established by resolution by the County of Monterey on March 17, 1987. The policies of the 1988 Bond Act Account shall not be
 modified or amended. Monterey County shall make an annual report to the Director of Finance on the disbursement of these funds. The Director of Finance shall assure that the County of Monterey expends the funds in accordance with this division.

(b) All lands acquired with these funds shall remain as natural lands in their present state in perpetuity and shall not be developed in any manner by any person or entity, public or private, except that this subdivision shall not apply to California Department of Transportation projects which are essential to maintain Highway One in its existing use as a rural, two lane, Scenic Highway.

(History: Added June 7, 1988, by initiative Proposition 70.)
-------------------------------------------

5929.

(a) Prior to recommending the acquisition of lands that are located on or near tidelands, submerged lands, swamp or overflowed lands, or other wetlands, whether or not those lands have been granted in trust to a local public agency, any state or local agency or nonprofit agency receiving funds under this division shall submit to the State Lands Commission any proposal for the acquisition of those lands pursuant to this division. The State Lands Commission shall,
 within three months of submittal, review the proposed acquisition, make a determination as to the state’s existing or potential interest in the lands, and report its findings to the entity making the submittal and to the Department of General Services.

(b) No wetlands or riparian habitat acquired pursuant to paragraph (7) of subdivision (c) of Section 5907 shall be used as a dredge spoil area or shall be subject to revetment which damages the quality of the habitat for which the property was acquired.

(c) No provision of this division shall be construed as authorizing the condemnation of state lands.

(History: Added June 7, 1988, by initiative Proposition 70.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Fiscal Provisions [5930. - 5938.]

5930.

Bonds in the total amount of seven hundred sixty-eight million six hundred seventy thousand dollars ($768,670,000), or so much thereof as is necessary, may be issued and sold to be used for carrying out the purposes expressed in this division and in Chapter 7.5 (commencing with Section 2700) of Division 3 of the Fish and Game Code and to be used to reimburse the General Obligation Bond Expense Revolving Fund pursuant to
 Section 16724.5 of the Government Code. A sum, not to exceed seven hundred twenty-six million dollars ($726,000,000) of the bond proceeds, shall be deposited in the California Wildlife, Coastal, and Park Land Conservation Fund of 1988 for the purposes of this division, and a sum, not to exceed fifty million dollars ($50,000,000) of bond proceeds, shall be deposited in the Wildlife and Natural Areas Conservation Fund for the purposes of the Wildlife and Natural Areas Conservation Program (Chapter 7.5 (commencing with Section 2700) of Division 3 of the Fish and Game Code). The bonds shall, when sold, be and constitute a valid and binding obligation of the State of California, and the full faith and credit of the State of California is hereby pledged for the punctual payment of both principal and interest as they become due and payable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 39, Sec. 93.   (SB 1018)   Effective June 27, 2012.   Note: This section was added on June 7, 1988, by initiative Prop. 70.)
-------------------------------------------

5931.

The bonds authorized by this division shall be prepared, executed, issued, sold, paid, and redeemed as provided in the State General Obligation Bond Law (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16720) of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code), and all provisions of that law shall apply to the bonds and are hereby incorporated in this division as though set forth in full in this division.

(History: Added June 7, 1988, by initiative Proposition 70.)
-------------------------------------------

5932.

(a) Solely for the purpose of authorizing the issuance and sale, pursuant to the State General Obligation Bond Law, of the bonds authorized by this division, the California Wildlife, Coastal, and Park Land Conservation Program of 1988 Finance Committee is hereby created. For purposes of this division, the California Wildlife, Coastal, and Park Land Conservation Program of 1988 Finance Committee is “the committee” as that term is used in the State General Obligation
 Bond Law. The committee shall consist of the Controller, the Director of Finance, and the Treasurer, or their designated representatives. The Treasurer shall serve as chairperson of the committee. A majority of the committee may act for the committee.

(b) For purposes of this division and Chapter 7.5 (commencing with Section 2700) of Division 3 of the Fish and Game Code and the State General Obligation Bond Law, the Wildlife Conservation Board, the Department of Parks and Recreation, the Department of Water Resources, the Department of Forestry, the Department of Fish and Game, the Santa Monica Mountains Conservancy, or the State Coastal Conservancy, depending on which agency has jurisdiction, is hereby designated as “the board.”

(History: Added June 7, 1988, by initiative Proposition 70.)
-------------------------------------------

5933.

The committee shall determine whether or not it is necessary or desirable to issue bonds authorized pursuant to this division in order to carry out the actions specified in Section 5907 of this code and Section 2720 of the Fish and Game Code, and, if so, the amount of bonds to be issued and sold. Successive issues of bonds may be authorized and sold to carry out those actions progressively, and it is not necessary that all of the bonds authorized to be issued be sold at any one
 time.

(History: Added June 7, 1988, by initiative Proposition 70.)
-------------------------------------------

5934.

There shall be collected annually in the same manner and at the same time as other state revenue is collected, in addition to the ordinary revenues of the state, a sum in an amount required to pay the principal of, and interest on, the bonds each year, and it is the duty of all officers charged by law with any duty in regard to the collection of the revenue to do and perform each and every act which is necessary to collect that additional sum.

(History: Added June 7, 1988, by initiative Proposition 70.)
-------------------------------------------

5935.

Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, there is hereby appropriated from the General Fund, for the purposes of this division, an amount that will equal the total of the following:

(1) The sum annually necessary to pay the principal of, and interest on, bonds issued and sold pursuant to this division, as the principal and interest become due and payable.

(2) The sum which is necessary to carry out the provisions of Section 5936, appropriated without regard to fiscal years.

(History: Added June 7, 1988, by initiative Proposition 70.)
-------------------------------------------

5936.

For the purposes of carrying out this division and Chapter 7.5 (commencing with Section 2700) of Division 3 of the Fish and Game Code, the Director of Finance may authorize the withdrawal from the General Fund of an amount or amounts not to exceed the amount of the unsold bonds which have been authorized to be sold for the purpose of carrying out those provisions. Any amounts withdrawn shall be deposited in the California Wildlife, Coastal, and Park Land Conservation Fund of 1988 or the
 Wildlife and Natural Areas Conservation Fund, as appropriate. Any money made available under this section shall be returned to the General Fund, plus the interest that the amounts would have earned in the Pooled Money Investment Account, from money received from the sale of bonds which would otherwise be deposited in that fund.

(History: Added June 7, 1988, by initiative Proposition 70.)
-------------------------------------------

5936.5.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this bond act, or of the State General Obligation Bond Law (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16720) of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code), if the Treasurer sells bonds pursuant to this bond act that include a bond counsel opinion to the effect that the interest on the bonds is excluded from
 gross income for federal tax purposes under designated conditions, the Treasurer may maintain separate accounts for the bond proceeds invested and the investment earnings on those proceeds, and may use or direct the use of those proceeds or earnings to pay any rebate, penalty, or other payment required under federal law, or take any other action with respect to the investment and use of those bond proceeds, as may be required or desirable under federal law in order to maintain the tax-exempt status of those bonds and to obtain any other advantage under federal law on behalf of the funds of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 652, Sec. 25.)
-------------------------------------------

5937.

All money derived from premium and accrued interest on bonds sold shall be reserved and shall be available for transfer to the General Fund as a credit to expenditures for bond interest.

(History: Added June 7, 1988, by initiative Proposition 70.)
-------------------------------------------

5938.

The people of California hereby find and declare that, inasmuch as the proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by this division are not “proceeds of taxes” as that term is used in Article XIIIB of the California Constitution, the disbursement of these proceeds is not subject to the limitation imposed by that article.

(History: Added June 7, 1988, by initiative Proposition 70.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 6. PUBLIC LANDS [6001. - 8558.]



PART 1. ADMINISTRATION AND CONTROL OF STATE LANDS [6001. - 6477.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [6001. - 6010.]

6001.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the general provisions and definitions set forth in this chapter shall govern the construction of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 548.)
-------------------------------------------

6002.

“Commission” means the State Lands Commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 548.)
-------------------------------------------

6003.

“City” includes “city and county.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 548.)
-------------------------------------------

6004.

“Oil and gas” includes oil, gas and all other hydrocarbon substances.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 548.)
-------------------------------------------

6005.

Whenever permissive authority or discretion is vested in any public officer or body under this division, such authority or discretion is subject to the condition that it be exercised in the best interests of the State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 548.)
-------------------------------------------

6006.

The repeal of Chapter 303 of the Statutes of 1921 and of Chapter 227 of the Statutes of 1923 effected by the State Lands Act of 1938 shall not affect any existing rights thereunder or any permit, lease, or agreement entered into under any provision of either chapter, nor shall it affect the rights or duties of any purchaser of State lands prior to June 11, 1938, the effective date of the State Lands Act of 1938.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 548.)
-------------------------------------------

6007.

The repeal by this code of any provision of law codified herein shall not affect any existing vested rights thereunder or any contract, permit, lease, or agreement entered into under any such provision of law, nor shall it affect the rights or duties of any purchaser of State lands sold prior to the effective date of such codification.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 548.)
-------------------------------------------

6008.

In order to protect the public’s access to, and use of, all state-owned lands in Humboldt Bay, no right to the use of any state lands, including, but not limited to, tide and submerged lands, in and adjacent to Humboldt Bay south of the entrance to the bay shall be sold.

This section shall not be applicable to settlements of title or boundary problems by the commission or to exchanges in connection therewith.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1132, Sec. 2.   Effective September 25, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

6009.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Upon admission to the United States, and as incident of its sovereignty, California received title to the tidelands, submerged lands, and beds of navigable lakes and rivers within its borders, to be held subject to the public trust for statewide public purposes, including commerce, navigation, fisheries, and other recognized uses, and for preservation in their natural state.

(b) The state’s power and right to control, regulate, and utilize its tidelands and submerged lands when acting within the terms of the public trust is absolute.

(c) Tidelands and submerged lands granted by the Legislature to local entities remain subject to the public trust, and remain subject to the oversight authority of the state by and through the State Lands Commission.

(d) Grantees are required to manage the state’s tidelands and submerged lands consistent with the terms and obligations of their grants and the public trust, without subjugation of statewide interests, concerns, or benefits to the inclination of local or municipal affairs, initiatives, or excises.

(e) The purposes and uses of tidelands and submerged lands is a statewide concern.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 330, Sec. 3.   (SB 1350)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

6009.1.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Granted public trust lands remain subject to the supervision of the state and the state retains its duty to protect the public interest in granted public trust lands.

(b) The state acts both as the trustor and the representative of the beneficiaries, who are all of the people of this state, with regard to public trust lands, and a grantee of public trust lands, including tidelands and submerged lands, acts as a trustee, with the granted tidelands and submerged lands as the corpus of the trust.

(c) A grantee may fulfill its fiduciary duties as trustee by
 determining the application of each of the following duties, all of which are applicable under common trust principles:

(1) The duty of loyalty.

(2) The duty of care.

(3) The duty of full disclosure.

(4) The duty to keep clear and adequate records and accounts.

(5) The duty to administer the trust solely in the interest of the beneficiaries.

(6) The duty to act impartially in managing the trust property.

(7) The duty to not use or deal with trust property for the trustee’s own profit or for any other purpose unconnected with the trust, and to not take part in a
 transaction in which the trustee has an interest adverse to the beneficiaries.

(8) The duty to take reasonable steps under the circumstances to take and keep control of and to preserve the trust property.

(9) The duty to make the trust property productive under the circumstances and in furtherance of the purposes of the trust.

(10) The duty to keep the trust property separate from other property not subject to the trust and to see that the trust property is designated as property of the trust.

(11) The duty to take reasonable steps to enforce claims that are part of the trust property.

(12) The duty to take reasonable steps to defend actions that may result in a loss to the trust.

(13) The duty to not delegate to others the performance of acts that the trustee can reasonably be required to perform and to not transfer the administration of the trust to a cotrustee. If a trustee has properly delegated a matter to an agent, the trustee has a duty to exercise direct supervision over the performance of the delegated matter.

(d) All duties endowed upon a trustee of state lands shall depend upon the terms of the trust, and if there is no provision, express or implied, within the terms of the trust, a statute, or a grant, the trustee’s duties shall be interpreted and determined by principles and rules evolved by courts of equity with respect to common trust principles.

(e) Notwithstanding any other law, and in addition to any other rights and capacities of a trustee to act under law, a trustee of public
 trust lands shall have the right to bring any action related to its granted public trust lands, including an action to abate a public nuisance, as a representative of the beneficiaries.

(f) Common trust principles do not nullify an act of the Legislature or modify its duty under the California Constitution to do all things necessary to execute and administer the public trust.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 368, Sec. 11.   (SB 859)   Effective September 14, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

6010.

The repeal of any provision of law codified in this division shall not affect any existing vested rights under those repealed provisions or under any contract, permit, lease, or agreement entered into under those repealed provisions, or the rights of any purchaser of school lands sold before the effective date of that repeal.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 311, Sec. 1.   (SB 1472)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. The State Lands Commission and the Division of State Lands [6101. - 6111.]

6101.

There is a State Lands Commission in the Resources Agency, consisting of the Controller, the Lieutenant Governor, and the Director of Finance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 770.)
-------------------------------------------

6102.

The commission is the successor to, and is vested with all the powers, duties, purposes, responsibilities and jurisdiction formerly vested in the Department of Finance as successor to the Surveyor General, Register of the State Land Office, and State Land Office, and of the Division of State Lands in the Resources Agency (formerly in the Department of Conservation). Whenever, by any statute or law now in force or that may be hereafter enacted, a duty or jurisdiction is imposed or authority conferred upon the Surveyor General, Register of the State Land Office, or State Land Office, or upon the Department of Finance as successor thereto, or upon the Chief of the Division of State Lands, or the Division of State Lands, such duty, jurisdiction, and authority are hereby transferred to, imposed and conferred upon the commission and the appropriate officers and employees thereof with the same force and effect as though the title of the State Lands Commission had been specifically set forth and named therein in lieu of the Surveyor General, Register of the State Land Office, State Land Office, Department of Finance, Chief of the Division of State Lands, or Division of State Lands, as the case may be.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 770.)
-------------------------------------------

6103.

The commission shall administer all laws and statutes committed to it through the Division of State Lands in the Resources Agency, which division is continued in existence. The commission is vested with all the powers conferred upon heads of departments of the state contained in Article 2 (commencing with Section 11150) of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

The commission may appoint and, with the approval of the Director of Finance, may fix the salaries of the officers and employees in the division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 770.)
-------------------------------------------

6103.2.

(a) The State Lands Commission and the Division of State Lands are hereby transferred from the Department of Conservation to the Resources Agency, and, as agencies in the Resources Agency, are vested with all the duties, powers, purposes, responsibilities, and jurisdiction vested in them as agencies of the Department of Conservation.

(b) Any reference in any law to the State Lands Commission or to the Division of State Lands in the Department of Finance or the Department of Conservation shall be considered a reference to the State Lands Commission or to the Division of State Lands, as the case may be, in the Resources Agency unless the context otherwise requires.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 770.)
-------------------------------------------

6103.4.

The State Lands Commission and the Division of State Lands may, as agencies of the Resources Agency, use the unexpended balances of funds available for use by them as agencies of the Department of Conservation in connection with the performance of the functions vested in them by Section 6103.2 as agencies of the Resources Agency. Such funds shall be used by them only for the purposes for which they were originally appropriated or otherwise made available to them as agencies of the Department of Conservation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 770.)
-------------------------------------------

6103.6.

All officers and employees of the State Lands Commission and the Division of State Lands who, on the operative date of this section, are serving in the state civil service, other than as temporary employees, and engaged in the performance of a function of the commission or division as an agency of the Department of Conservation which is vested in the commission or division by Section 6103.2 as an agency of the Resources Agency, shall be transferred to the State Lands Commission and the Division of State Lands in the Resources Agency. The status, positions, and rights of such persons shall not be affected by the transfer, and shall be retained by them as officers and employees of the State Lands Commission and the Division of State Lands in the Resources Agency pursuant to the State Civil Service Act, except as to positions exempt from civil service in the State Lands Commission and the Division of State Lands in the Department of Conservation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 770.)
-------------------------------------------

6103.8.

The State Lands Commission and the Division of State Lands, as agencies of the Resources Agency, shall have the possession and control of all records, papers, offices, moneys, funds, appropriations, lands and other property, real or personal, held for the benefit or use of the State Lands Commission and the Division of State Lands as agencies of the Department of Conservation in connection with the performance of the duties, powers, purposes, responsibilities, and jurisdiction of the State Lands Commission and the Division of State Lands as agencies of the Department of Conservation that are transferred to or vested in them by Section 6103.2 as agencies of the Resources Agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 770.)
-------------------------------------------

6104.

The commission shall meet, upon due notice to all members thereof, at such times and places within the State as are deemed necessary by it for the proper transaction of the business committed to it.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 548.)
-------------------------------------------

6105.

The commission shall adopt rules governing the conduct of the business of the commission. No action of the commission shall be valid unless authorized by resolution adopted at a meeting after due notice thereof and by at least two of the members of the commission present.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 548.)
-------------------------------------------

6106.

The commission may, by resolution, authorize any of its employees or officers to execute any instrument in the name of the State.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1941, Ch. 1241.)
-------------------------------------------

6107.

Whenever the commission, pursuant to authority granted to it by law, enters into any agreement for the compromise or settlement of title or boundary claims, the agreement shall be submitted to the Governor, and if approved by him or her shall thereupon, but not before, be binding upon the state and the other party to the agreement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 742, Sec. 8.   (SB 1493)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

6108.

The commission may make and enforce all reasonable and proper rules and regulations consistent with law for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this division and incidental thereto.

The commission may prepare, execute, and deliver all papers, instruments, and documents, and may do any and all things necessary fully and completely to effectuate the purposes of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 548.)
-------------------------------------------

6110.

The State Lands Commission may, by resolution, designate an officer or employee of the commission to conduct the public hearings which the commission is required to hold under Sections 126 and 11425 of the Government Code, or any other state law.

The designated officer or employee shall act in the commission’s place and stead and the hearings shall be conducted to all intents and purposes as though the commission were actually present. The designated officer or employee shall have no power to adopt, amend, or repeal any rule or regulation of the commission or to make any final determination in the name of the commission. The designated officer or employee shall make a written report to the commission of all relevant matters presented at such hearings and shall transmit to the commission any statements, arguments, or contentions in writing which may be presented.

The commission shall not make any finding or declaration nor adopt, amend, or repeal any regulation which has been considered at a public hearing conducted by a designated officer or employee of the commission until the commission has considered at a public meeting the written report of the officer or employee and any statements, arguments, or contentions in writing which may have been presented at the hearing conducted by such officer or employee, together with any statements, arguments, or contentions which may be presented at the public meeting of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1906.)